Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.010

Designation.

The state university located and established in Seattle, King county, shall be designated the University of Washington.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.010. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 238 s 1; RRS s 4544; prior: 1897 c 118 s 182; 1890 p 395 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.77.010.]